District of Columbia statutes.
2-308.01

Repealed

Sovereign immunity defense not available.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 801, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.1.
Pursuant to § 101(ff) of D.C. Law 11-259, which enacted Subpart B. Part B, 2001 Ed. of this subchapter, consisting of §§ 1-1188.7 through 1-1188.12 §§ 2-308.07 through 2-308.12, 2001 Ed., the preexisting provisions of this subchapter were designated as Subpart A of Part A, 2001 Ed.